Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-204
Rooming house, defined.

Rooming house shall mean every building or other structure kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where sleeping accommodations are furnished for pay to transient or permanent guests in which five or more rooms are used for the accommodation of such guests, but which does not maintain dining rooms or cafes in connection therewith, and which has not been designated as a hotel or boarding house.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 4.